District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.09

Use of donated annual leave.

A leave recipient may use annual leave received from the leave bank in the same manner and for the same purposes as if the leave recipient had accrued the leave, except that any annual leave and, if applicable, any sick leave accrued or accumulated to the leave recipient, or any advanced sick leave or compensatory time shall be used before any leave from the leave bank shall be used.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1209
as added Sept. 11, 1990, D.C. Law 8-155, § 2, 37 DCR 4159
1981 Ed., § 1-613.9.